Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 5. Trustees.

§ 13.1-1228.
Trustee management; limitation on duties and liabilities of others.

Except to the extent otherwise provided in the articles of trust or in the governing instrument of a business trust, the trustees shall choose and supervise the officers and employees of the business trust, and the business and affairs of the business trust shall be managed under the direction of the trustees.

Except to the extent provided in the governing instrument of a business trust, neither the power to give direction to a trustee or other persons nor the exercise by any person of a direction, including a beneficial owner, shall cause that person to have duties, including fiduciary duties, or liabilities relating to the business trust or to a beneficial owner, or cause any such person to be a trustee.

History.

2002, c. 621.

Effective date.

This chapter became effective October 1, 2003.

§ 13.1-1229.
Trustee standards of conduct; trustee liability; restrictions on liability limitations in governing instrument.

A trustee shall discharge his duties as a trustee in accordance with the standards of conduct provided for directors of a Virginia corporation pursuant to §§

13.1-690

and

13.1-691

.

Subject to the provisions of subsection C, and except to the extent otherwise provided in the articles of trust or in the governing instrument of a business trust, a trustee, when acting in such capacity, is not personally liable to any person other than the business trust or a beneficial owner for any act, omission, or obligation of the business trust or any trustee.

A trustee or officer of a business trust shall have no liability to the business trust or a beneficial owner for any act or omission greater than that of directors or officers of a Virginia corporation to the corporation as provided in Chapter 9 (§

13.1-601

et seq.) of this title, including any elimination of liability provided for in the articles of trust or governing instrument.

History.

2002, c. 621.

§ 13.1-1230.
Indemnification.

A business trust shall have the power to indemnify and hold harmless any trustee, officer, employee or agent from and against any and all claims and demands to the same extent as a director, officer, employee or agent of a Virginia corporation under Chapter 9 (§

13.1-601

et seq.) of this title.

A trustee or officer of a business trust shall be entitled to mandatory indemnification to the same extent as a director or officer of a Virginia corporation under Chapter 9 (§

13.1-601

et seq.) of this title.

A trustee or officer may apply for court-ordered indemnification in the same manner as a director or officer of a Virginia corporation pursuant to §

13.1-700.1

.

A business trust may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of an individual who is or was a trustee, officer, employee, or agent of the business trust, or who, while a trustee, officer, employee, or agent of the business trust, is or was serving at the request of the business trust as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee, or agent of a foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan, or other enterprise, against liability asserted against or incurred by him in that capacity or arising from his status as a director, officer, employee, or agent, whether or not the business trust would have power to indemnify him against the same liability under this section.

History.

2002, c. 621.